morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
LEXICON EndQuote
%'^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFUV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFRV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBUV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBRV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFUV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFRV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBUV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBRV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFUV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFRV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBUV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBRV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;

LEXICON EndQuoteCont
                 N;
!%<N%>:@RB       Nderiv;    ! these are useful in case we want this to 
!%<N%>:@RB       Ninfl;     ! apply only if there are inflections.


!
! Rules governing nouns, including proper names and compounding
!


LEXICON NPcomp  ! this is only for lexicalized forms with compounding
@NCOMP%<N%:prop%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB NPcont;

@NCOMP%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MREDUP@RB NPcont;


LEXICON NPPart
%<N%:prop%:partial%>:@RB   NPcont;

LEXICON NP
%<N%:prop%>:@RB   NPcont;

%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPcont;


LEXICON NP_typo

%<N%:prop%:typo%>:@RB   NPcont;
%<N%:prop%:mredup%:typo%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPcont;


LEXICON NP_abbr
%<N%:prop%:abbr%>:@ABBR@RB   NPAbbrCont;

LEXICON NPAbbrCont
                ENDLEX;
                NPApos;

                NPAposCont;


LEXICON NPcont
                ENDLEX;
                NPApos;

                NPAposCont;



LEXICON NPApos  
0:@APOS@MB     NPAposCont;

LEXICON   NPAposCont  
                Nderiv;
                Ninfl;

LEXICON NPnation
%<N%:prop%>:@RB   NPnationCont;

%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPnationCont;


LEXICON NPnationCont
                NPcont;
                ND_CAlanguage;

LEXICON NPperson
%<N%:prop%>:@RB   NPpersonCont;

%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPpersonCont;


LEXICON NPpersonCont
                NPcont;
0:@APOS@MB      D_gil;

                D_gil;




LEXICON Ncomp ! this is only for lexicalized forms with compounding
@NCOMP%<N%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB NcompCont;

@NCOMP%<N%:mredup%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MREDUP@RB NcompCont;


LEXICON NcompInfl  ! this is for regular nouns
%<ncomp%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MB    NcompCont;


LEXICON NcompCont

0:@APOS@MB  NcompAposCont;

            ENDLEX;
            NcompAposCont;

LEXICON NcompAposCont
                Nderiv;
                Ninfl;

LEXICON Ninfl
                Nplu;
                Npos;
                Ncase;
                NomPredicate;

!
! Nouns representing family members can get plural after p1s/p2s
!
! teyze-m-ler, dayın-n-lar ..
! -lAr here works like a derivational morpheme that derives another
! (plural) noun. However, it is at best odd to have another possessive
! suffix, so, we do not allow another possessive suffix after -lAr.
!
! These may also be treated as a proper noun in combination with the
! person's name, needing an apostrophe after the possessive suffix.
! E.g., "Ahmet Amcam'ın"

LEXICON Nfamily
%<N%>:@RB   Ncont;
%<N%>:@RB   NfamCont;

%<N%::mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    Ncont;
%<N%::mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NfamCont;


LEXICON NfamCont
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB@APOS@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB@APOS@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB@APOS@MB      NposCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB@APOS@MB      NposCont;
%<p3s%>:^(s)^I@MB@APOS@MB     NposCont;

LEXICON NfamPosCont
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB NposCont;
! %<pl%>:l^Ar@MB NpluCont; ! use this instead  of the above line
                           ! to accept forms like dayı-n-lar-ım

!
! Noun abbreviations
!

LEXICON N_unit  ! we may treat these differntly later
%<N%:abbr%>:@ABBR@RB       NAbbrCont;

LEXICON N_abbr  
%<N%:abbr%>:@ABBR@RB       NAbbrCont;

LEXICON NAbbrCont
                        ENDLEX;
0:@APOS@MB              Ncont;

                        Ncont;


!
! End of family nouns + possessive-plural 
!

LEXICON N
%<N%>:@RB       Ncont;

%<N%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    Ncont;


LEXICON N_typo

%<N%:typo%>:@RB     Ncont;


LEXICON NPart
%<N%:partial%>:@RB   ENDLEX;

LEXICON NPartLast
%<N%:partial%>:@RB   Ncont;

LEXICON Ncont
    Nderiv;
    NcompCont; ! includes final


LEXICON Ntime
%<N%>:@RB    NtimeCont;

LEXICON NtimeCont
                    Ki;
                    D_dir;
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      D_dir;
                    Ncont;
                    D_lArI;
                    D_lIGInA;

LEXICON Nplu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB NpluCont;

LEXICON NpluCont
   ENDLEX;
   Npos;
   Ncase;
   NomPredicatePLU;
   ND_CA;
   D_arasi;

LEXICON Npos
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB      NposCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB      NposCont;
%<p3s%>:^(s)^I@MB     Npos3sCont;
%<p1p%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB   NposCont;
%<p2p%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB   NposCont;
%<p3p%>:l^Ar^I@MB     NposCont;

LEXICON Npos3sCont
        NposCont;

0:@APOS@MB  NposCont;



LEXICON  NposCont
    ENDLEX;
    Ncase;
    NomPredicate;
    D_gil; ! TODO: this should be restricted
    ND_CA;

LEXICON  NCaseNoGen
! %<nom%>:^(y)^I@MB   NomCaseCont; ! we do not (yet) mark for nominative
%<acc%>:^(y)^I@MB   AccCaseCont;
%<dat%>:^(y)^A@MB   Case1Cont;
%<abl%>:^D^An@MB    Case1Cont;
%<ins%>:^(y)l^NS^A@MB  Case1Cont;
%<loc%>:^D^A@MB     LocCaseCont;

LEXICON  Ncase
                    D_sIz; ! sIz can combine after most of the inflectional suffixes
                    NCaseNoGen;                    
%<gen%>:^(n)^In@MB  GenCaseCont;

LEXICON Case1Cont
            ENDLEX;
            NomPredicate;

!
! Normally, predicative use after accusative is almost an
! impossibility, but some forms exist: `renginiyse Ali seçmiş', 
!
LEXICON AccCaseCont
             Case1Cont;
!            ENDLEX;

LEXICON LocCaseCont
            ENDLEX;
            Ki;
            NomPredicate;

LEXICON GenCaseCont
            ENDLEX;
            Ki;
            NomPredicate;

LEXICON Ki
%<ki%>:ki@MB DerivJCont;

!
! This part deals with person agreement
!

LEXICON NomPredicatePLU

%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 NomPredPagr;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 NomPredPagr3s;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 NomPredDir;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 CplAll;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 ENDLEX;

                                       NomPredQ;
                                      CliticSA;

LEXICON NomPredicate

%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                       NomPredPagr3p;

                                      NomPredicatePLU;

LEXICON Root
cuma                  Ntime;
şubat                 Ntime;
haziran               Ntime;
ekim                  Ntime;
ası@DEL@r             Ntime;
çağ                   Ntime;
devi@DEL@r            Ntime;
gece                  Ntime;
mevsim                Ntime;
salise                Ntime;
sene                  Ntime;
yıl                   Ntime;
son                   Ntime; ! this does not get -ki, but gets -lArI
ağbi                  Nfamily; ! officially this is wrong
abla                  Nfamily;
ağabey                Nfamily;
amca                  Nfamily;
ana                   Nfamily;
anneanne              Nfamily;
ayçiçe^k              Ncomp;
aydınlıkölçer         N;
babaanne              Nfamily;
bacı                  Nfamily;
biraev                Ncomp;
buu^t                 N;
büyükbaba             Nfamily;
dede                  Nfamily;
demiryol              Ncomp;
dikel                 N;
diş% macun            Ncomp;
faltaş                Ncomp;
feodalizm             N;
göbektaş              Ncomp;
güçbirli^k            Ncomp;
hˈala                  Nfamily;
hanımel               Ncomp;
harım                 N;
işgü^c                Ncomp;
istiba^t              N;
kardeş                Nfamily;
kendirgiller          N;
kuşdili               N;
mˈidyeci               N;
milet% vekil          Ncomp;
önkoşul               N;
rahne                 N;
sesyayar              N;
sutop                 Ncomp;
tˈeyze                 Nfamily;
türbin                N;
zeytinyağ             Ncomp;
mˈodaev                Ncomp;
emmioğlu              Nfamily;
Suişler                 NPcomp;
Alman                  NPnation;
Beyoğl                 NPcomp;
Boğataş                NPcomp;
Boğaziç                NPcomp;
Chamarro               NP;
Çınaralt               NPcomp;
Eminön                 NPcomp;
İzgün                  NP;
Kızkule                NPcomp;
Ozansü                 NP;
Sarayburn              NPcomp;
Toralp                 NP;
Türk                   NPnation;
Yusufel                NPcomp;
Arer          NPperson;
Berter        NPperson;
Erginal       NPperson;
Karaoğlan     NPperson;
Orkutay       NPperson;
Tansuğ        NPperson;
Yoruç         NPperson;
Umut       NPperson;
Gülennur      NPperson;
Pürfer        NPperson;
Armaner           NPperson;
Erhan             NPperson;
Mirkelamoğlu      NPperson;
Ulus              NPperson;
Şehitkamil           NP;
Balıbıdık             NP;
Çeşmeköy              NP;
Emirhacılı            NP;
Haspınar              NP;
Keçemağara            NP;
Saylak                NP;
Büyük% Yapalak        NP;
New                     NPPart;
Kaf% Dağ                NPcomp;
bark       NPartLast;
bereket    NPartLast;
boncuk     NPartLast;
büdü       NPartLast;
edi        NPartLast;
falan      NPartLast;
incik      NPartLast;
kallem     NPartLast;
pos        NPartLast;
sop        NPartLast;
kesekağı^t            Ncomp;
Devrekani              NP;
BÖTE                N_abbr;
M.Ö              N_abbr;
sd              N_abbr;
Yeşilçağ        NP;
RECO                    NP_abbr;
cm                      N_unit;
m                       N_unit;
km                      N_unit;
km/s                    N_unit;
mm²                     N_unit;
cm²                     N_unit;
cm2                     N_unit;
m²                      N_unit;
km²                     N_unit;
mm³^sFRV^sUC            N_unit;
m³^sFRV^sUC             N_unit;
km³^sFRV^sUC            N_unit;
kg^sBUV^sVC             N_unit;
l                       N_unit;
KDV                     N_abbr;
İMKB^sFUV               NP_abbr;
KOSGEB                  NP_abbr;
Şti                     N_abbr;
A.Ş                     N_abbr;
AGİT  NP_abbr;
BEÜ  NP_abbr;
DKK  NP_abbr;
GSGM  NP_abbr;
ISSN  NP_abbr;
MOSSAD  NP_abbr;
SMWK  NP_abbr;
TÜBA  NP_abbr;
ÜDS  NP_abbr;
BCG  N_abbr;
GSMH  N_abbr;
MHz  N_abbr;
TÜFE  N_abbr;
mp3  N_abbr;
GDO           N_abbr;
TÜRGEV        NP_abbr;
LCD           N_abbr;
DDK^sBUR      NP_abbr;
DNS^sFUR^sVC  N_abbr;
börtü       NPart;
çoluk       NPart;
çolu^k      NPartLast;
ıvır        NPart;
konu        NPart;      !in `konu komşu'
uçuç        NPart;
zıvır       NPartLast;
müpe        NPartLast;
